Utah statutes.
75-7-604.   Capacity of settlor of revocable trust.

The capacity required to create, amend, revoke, or add property to a revocable trust, or to direct the actions of the trustee of a revocable trust, is the same as that required to make a will.



Enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

